Wyoming statutes. Title 34 Property, Conveyances and Security Transactions
Chapter 18 Uniform Principal and Income Act [Renumbered]

§§ 34-18-101 through 34-18-116.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered by Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to Wyoming Uniform Principal and Income Act, see §

2-3-801

et seq.

Editor's notes. —

Former §§ 34-18-115 and 34-18-116 (renumbered as §§ 2-3-245 and 2-3-246 by § 3, ch. 142, Laws 1979) were repealed by § 2, ch. 54, Laws 1980, effective April 1, 1980.